Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20259-1108
Gaming operator license; applicant; fingerprinting and criminal history record information check; costs.

Any person applying for a gaming operator license pursuant to the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act shall be subject to fingerprinting and a check of such person's criminal history record information maintained by the Federal Bureau of Investigation through the Nebraska State Patrol. Each applicant shall furnish to the Nebraska State Patrol a full set of legible fingerprints to enable a criminal background investigation to be conducted. The Nebraska State Patrol shall submit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check. The Nebraska State Patrol shall issue a report to the commission that includes the information collected from the national criminal history record information check concerning the individual. Such requirements shall be for the purpose of determining whether the commission has a basis to deny the license application or to suspend, cancel, or revoke the person's license. The applicant shall pay the actual cost of any fingerprinting or check of such person's criminal history record information.

Laws 2021, LB561, § 32;

Laws 2025, LB357, § 17.